Utah statutes.
61-2e-204.   Renewal of a registration.
(1) (a)  A registration under this chapter expires two years from the day on
which the registration is filed.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a), the time period of a registration may
be extended or shortened by as much as one year to maintain or change a
renewal cycle established by rule by the division.
(2)  To renew a registration under this chapter, before the day on which the
registration expires, an appraisal management company shall:
(a)  file with the division a renewal registration application on a form
prescribed by the division; and
(b)  pay to the division a fee determined in accordance with Section
63J-1-504.
(3)  A renewal registration application shall include substantially similar
information to the information required under Section 61-2e-202, except that
for an individual described in Subsection 61-2e-202(1)(e) or (g), the entity
is required to report whether the individual has had:
(a) (i)  a conviction of a criminal offense;
(ii)  the entry of a plea in abeyance to a criminal offense; or
(iii)  the potential resolution of a criminal case by:
(A)  a diversion agreement; or
(B)  another agreement under which a criminal charge is held in suspense for a
period of time;
(b)  a filing of personal bankruptcy or bankruptcy of a business that
transacts the appraisal management services;
(c)  the suspension, revocation, surrender, cancellation, or denial of a
professional license or certification, whether the license or registration is
issued by this state or another jurisdiction; or
(d)  the entry of a cease and desist order or a temporary or permanent
injunction:
(i)  against the individual by a court or government agency; and
(ii)  on the basis of:
(A)  conduct or a practice involving the business of appraisal management
services; or
(B)  conduct involving fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit.
(4)  A registration expires if it is not renewed on or before its expiration
date, except that for a period of 30 days after the expiration date, the
registration may be reinstated upon compliance with this section, including
payment of a renewal fee and a late fee determined by the division and the
board.
